src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_77SÜÜMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ süümä:süü
!! * Yaml: __sueuemae__
+V: FRONT_INF_mä ; !!= * @CODE@ süü
+V:d%^WGStem FRONT_INF_äq ; !!= * @CODE@ süvv

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süü
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süüt
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>deq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süüdeq
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süü
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süütiq
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>deq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süüdeq
+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ süü

+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>se FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ sööse
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VOWLower%>miq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ söömiq
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%>väq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ sööväq

+V:d%^WGStem%>ä FRONT_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRS ; !!= * @CODE@ süvvä 

!!These must be fixed 2015-06-09
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sei FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: seie FRONT_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seit FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiet FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seieq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seideq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiedeq FRONT_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sei FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: seie FRONT_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: seimiq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: seiemiq FRONT_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seitiq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seietiq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seideq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seiedeq FRONT_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seiq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seieq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seiväq FRONT_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seieväq FRONT_K ;


+V:d%^WGStem FRONT_IND-PRT-OC1-2_i ; !!= * @CODE@ süvv

+V:d FRONT_IND-PRT-OC3_i ; !!= * @CODE@ süüd

+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_vä ; !!= * @CODE@ süü

+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_däv ; !!= * @CODE@ süü

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%^VOWLower%>nüq FRONT_K ; !!= * @CODE@ söönüq

+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC-OBL_nü ; !!= * @CODE@ süü

+V: FRONT_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ; !!≈ * @CODE@ süü
!!

+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ; !!≈ * @CODE@ süü, süüt, 
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_se ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG1_ie ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_ie ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_väq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_VÕIMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ võima:või
!! * Yaml: __V-vwima__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_78SAAMA
!! * Yaml: __saama__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_sõ ;
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iõ ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_iõ ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_iaq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_78VIIMÄ
!! * Yaml: __V-viimae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_se ;
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_väq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG1_ie ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG3_ie ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_iäq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_MINEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ minemä:min
!! * Yaml: __V-minemae__
+V:%>e FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V+Inf:%>näq FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+PrfPrc:%>t FRONT_K ;
+Use/NG+V+Pss+PrfPrc:%>tü FRONT_K ;
+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>däs FRONT_K ;
+V:%>ne FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: MUTUAL_JUS_kuq ;
!! Remainder is in exceptions.lexc



LEXICON V_79TULÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tulõma:tul
!! * Yaml: __tulwma__
!+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
!+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
!+V:õ V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
!+V:õ BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;
!
!+V:%{XC%} BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iõ ;
!+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
!+V:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!!+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%{XC%}ʼ K ;
!+V:%{XC%} V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
!+V:%{XC%} BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;
!
!+V:õ BACK_INF_ma ;
!+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
!+V:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
!+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
!+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
!+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

+V: V0_79TULÕMA ;

LEXICON V0_79TULÕMA !!= * @CODE@ tulõma:tul
!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:õ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) tulõma
!! +Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
!! +Jus, 

!! Strengthen consonant
:%{XC%} BACK_INF_aq ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) tullaq
!! Inf 
!! Strengthen consonant 
:%{XC%}%>õ BACK_ACT-PRSPRC-SG-NOM_v ; !!= * @CODE@ (2b) tullõv
!! Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
: BACK_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) tulnuq
!! +Act+PrfPrc

!! Retain consonant 
: BACK_LUGÕMA_PSS-PRC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) tul
!! Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc, 


!! Retain consonant and add õ
:õ BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-CONNEGII ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) tulõ
!! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!! Pss+Ind

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:õ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-3_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) tulõma
!! Ind+Prs+ 3

!! Strengthen consonant and replace stem vowel with i
:%{XC%}%>i BACK_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) loi
!! Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

!! Strengthen consonant and add ʼ
:%{XC%}%>ʼ BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) tullʼ
!! Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

LEXICON V_OLÕMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ olõma:o
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:lõ BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:m K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:mmaq K ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iõ ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:llʼ K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:lli K ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:lõ BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:l BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:lõ BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_80RAPAHUTMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rapahutma:rapahuta
!+V:%^WGStema BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
!+V:a BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
!+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
!+V:a BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_vaq ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;
!
!+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_APOSTROPHE ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-SCPL3_vaq ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;
!
!+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
!+V: BACK_INF_aq ;
!+V:a BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
!+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
!+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
!+V:%^WGStemõ BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V: V0_80RAPAHUTMA ;
