src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
aama:aa V_78SAAMA  "" ;
haarahutma:haarahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
habahutma:habahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
hargahutma:hargahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
haugahutma:haugahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
hõngahutma:hõngahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
hõõrahutma:hõõrahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
ikahutma:ikahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
illahutma:illahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
jorahutma:jorahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kaabahutma:kaabahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kaagahutma:kaagahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kaehutma:kaehuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kallahutma:kallahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kiidsahutma:kiidsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kilahutma:kilahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kirmahutma:kirmahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
klõnksahutma:klõnksahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kobahutma:kobahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kolahutma:kolahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
koorahutma:koorahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kopahutma:kopahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kraabahutma:kraabahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
kumbahutma:kumbahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
käümä:käü V_77SÜÜMÄ  "" ;
kõhvahutma:kõhvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lapahutma:lapahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
liigahutma:liigahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
litsahutma:litsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lobahutma:lobahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lopahutma:lopahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lopsahutma:lopsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lõigahutma:lõigahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lõnksahutma:lõnksahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
lüümä:lüü V_77SÜÜMÄ  "" ;
manʼahutma:manʼahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
minemä:min V_MINEMÄ  "" ;
murrahutma:murrahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
müümä:müü V_77SÜÜMÄ  "" ;
nudsahutma:nudsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
nuhahutma:nuhahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
olõma:o V_OLÕMA  "" ;
osahutma:osahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
painahutma:painahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
paugahutma:paugahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
purõma:pur V_79TULÕMA  "" ;
putahutma:putahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
põngahutma:põngahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
põrahutma:põrahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
rapahutma:rapahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
rapsahutma:rapsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
robahutma:robahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
roobahutma:roobahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
rʼavvahutma:rʼavvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
rʼavvahutma:rʼavvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
saama:saa V_78SAAMA  "" ;
saisahutma:saisahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
saistahutma:saistahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
suigahutma:suigahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
süümä:süü V_77SÜÜMÄ  "" ;
tarahutma:tarahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tiirahutma:tiirahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tirahutma:tirahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsiirahutma:tsiirahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsilgahutma:tsilgahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsipsahutma:tsipsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsirdsahutma:tsirdsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsirdsahutma:tsirahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsiugahutma:tsiugahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsolksahutma:tsolksahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsorahutma:tsorahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsordsahutma:tsordsahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsuiahutma:tsuiahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsungahutma:tsungahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsurmahutma:tsurmahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsusahutma:tsusahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsõõrahutma:tsõõrahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsʼaksahutma:tsʼaksahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsʼaksahutma:tsʼakahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsʼaunahutma:tsʼaunahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tsʼuhahutma:tsʼuhahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tulõma:tul V_79TULÕMA  "" ;
tõigahutma:tõigahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tõngahutma:tõngahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tõrahutma:tõrahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
tõrgahutma:tõrgahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
unõhutma:unõhuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
valmahutma:valmahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
valvahutma:valvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
vavvahutma:vavvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
vihvahutma:vihvahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
viimä:vii V_78SAAMA  "" ;
vilksahutma:vilksahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
vingahutma:vingahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
vinnähütmä:vinnähüt V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
vinnähütmä:vinähüt V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
virahutma:virahuta V_80RAPAHUTMA  "" ;
võima:või V_VÕIMA  "" ;
